North Carolina statutes. Chapter 74C. Private Protective Services.
Article 1. Private Protective Services Board.

§ 74C-1.
Title.

This Chapter may be cited as the Private Protective Services Act. The purpose of this act is to increase the level of integrity, competency, and performance of Private Protective Service Professions in order to safeguard the public health, safety, and welfare.

History.

1979, c. 818, s. 2; 1989, c. 759, s. 1.

§ 74C-2.
Licenses required.

No private person, firm, association, or corporation shall engage in, perform any services as, or in any way represent or hold itself out as engaging in a private protective services profession or activity in this State without having first complied with the provisions of this Chapter. Compliance with the licensing requirements of this Chapter shall not relieve any person, firm, association or corporation from compliance with any other licensing law.

An individual in possession of a valid private protective services license or private detective trainee permit issued prior to October 1, 1989, shall not be subject to forfeiture of such license by virtue of this Chapter. Such license shall, however, remain subject to suspension, denial, or revocation in the same manner in which all other licenses issued pursuant to this Chapter are subject to suspension, denial, or revocation.

In its discretion, the Private Protective Services Board may issue a trainee permit in lieu of a private investigator license provided that the applicant works under the direct supervision of a licensee.

History.

1973, c. 528, s. 1; 1979, c. 818, s. 1; 1989, c. 759, s. 2.

OPINIONS OF ATTORNEY GENERAL

This chapter does not require that a municipality obtain a private protective service license when the municipality provides police services on a contractual basis to a nonprofit hospital. See opinion of the Attorney General to Mr. James F. Kirk, Administrator, Private Protective Services Board, 58 N.C. Op. Att'y Gen. 45 (June 15, 1988).

The fact that a municipality maintains liability insurance on officers assigned to furnish police services on a contractual basis

to a nonprofit hospital does not require municipality to obtain a private protective service license. See opinion of the Attorney General to Mr. James F. Kirk, Administrator, Private Protective Services Board, 58 N.C. Op. Att'y Gen. 45 (June 15, 1988).

§ 74C-3.
Private protective services profession defined.

As used in this Chapter, the term “private protective services profession” means and includes the following:

Armored car profession. — Any person, firm, association, or corporation which for a fee or other valuable consideration provides secured transportation and protection from one place or point to another place or point of money, currency, coins, bullion, securities, checks, documents, stocks, bonds, jewelry, paintings, and other valuables. This definition does not include a person operating an armored car business pursuant to a motor carrier certificate or permit issued by the North Carolina Utilities Commission which grants operating rights for such business; however, armed armored car service guards shall be subject to the provisions of

G.S. 74C-13

.

Repealed by Session Laws 1983, c. 786, s. 2.

Redesignated as subdivision (a)(5a) by the Revisor of Statutes. See Editor’s notes.

Courier service profession. — Any person, firm, association, or corporation which for a fee or other valuable consideration transports or offers to transport from one place or point to another place or point documents, papers, maps, stocks, bonds, checks, or other small items of value which require expeditious services. Armed courier service guards shall be subject to the provisions of

G.S. 74C-13

.

Detection of deception examiner. — Any person, firm, association, or corporation which uses any device or instrument, regardless of its name or design, for the purpose of the detection of deception or any person who reviews the work product of an examiner including charts, tapes or other methods of record keeping for the purpose of detecting deception or determining accuracy.

(5a)

Electronic countermeasures profession. —

Any person, firm, association, or corporation which for a fee or other valuable consideration discovers, locates, or disengages by electronic, electrical, or mechanical means any listening or other monitoring equipment surreptitiously placed to gather information concerning any individual, firm, association, or corporation.

Security guard and patrol profession. — Any person, firm, association, or corporation that provides a security guard on a contractual basis for another person, firm, association, or corporation for a fee or other valuable consideration and performs one or more of the following functions:

Prevention or detection of intrusion, entry, larceny, vandalism, abuse, fire, or trespass on private property.

Prevention, observation, or detection of any unauthorized activity on private property.

Protection of patrons and persons lawfully authorized to be on the premises or being escorted between premises of the person, firm, association, or corporation that entered into the contract for security services.

Control, regulation, or direction of the flow or movement of the public, whether by vehicle or otherwise, only to the extent and for the time directly and specifically required to assure the protection of properties.

(Delayed expiration — see note) Security services related to entry and exit, direction and movement of individuals at entry and exit, security working towers, and perimeter security patrols at State prison facilities.

Guard dog service profession. — Any person, firm, association, or corporation which for a fee or other valuable consideration contracts with another person, firm, association, or corporation to place, lease, rent, or sell a trained dog for the purpose of protecting lives or property.

Private detective or private investigator. — Any person who engages in the profession of or accepts employment to furnish, agrees to make, or makes inquiries or investigations concerning any of the following on a contractual basis:

Crimes or wrongs done or threatened against the United States or any state or territory of the United States.

The identity, habits, conduct, business, occupation, honesty, integrity, credibility, knowledge, trustworthiness, efficiency, loyalty, activity, movement, whereabouts, affiliations, associations, transactions, acts, reputation, or character of any person.

The location, disposition, or recovery of lost or stolen property.

The cause or responsibility for fires, libels, losses, accidents, damages, or injuries to persons or to properties.

Securing evidence to be used before any court, board, officer, or investigative committee.

Protection of individuals from serious bodily harm or death.

Special limited guard and patrol profession. — Any person who is licensed under Chapter 74D of the General Statutes of North Carolina and provides armed alarm responders pursuant to G.S. 74C-13. Applicants for this limited license shall not be required to meet the experience requirements for a security guard and patrol license. Any experience gained under this limited license shall not be counted as experience for a security guard and patrol license.

“Private protective services” shall not include any of the following:

Licensed insurance adjusters legally employed as such and who engage in no other investigative activities unconnected with adjustment or claims against an insurance company.

An officer or employee of the United States, this State, or any political subdivision of either while the officer or employee is engaged in the performance of his or her official duties within the course and scope of his or her employment with the United States, this State, or any political subdivision of either.

A person engaged exclusively in the business of obtaining and furnishing information as to the financial rating or credit worthiness of persons; and a person who provides consumer reports in connection with:

Credit transactions involving the consumer on whom the information is to be furnished and involving the extensions of credit to the consumer,

Information for employment purposes,

Information for the underwriting of insurance involving the consumer,

Information in connection with a determination of the consumer’s eligibility for a license or other benefit granted by a governmental instrumentality required by law to consider an applicant’s financial responsibility, or

A legitimate business need for the information in connection with a business transaction involving the consumer.

An attorney at law licensed to practice in North Carolina while engaged in the practice of law and the attorney’s agent, provided the agent is performing duties only in connection with his or her principal’s practice of law.

The legal owner or lien holder, and his or her agents and employees, of personal property which has been sold in a transaction wherein a security interest in personal property has been created to secure the sales transaction, who engage in repossession of the personal property.

Repealed by Session Laws 1989, c. 759, s. 3.

Repealed by Session Laws 1981, c. 807, s. 1.

Employees of a licensee who are employed exclusively as undercover agents; provided that for purposes of this section, undercover agent means an individual hired by another person, firm, association, or corporation to perform a job for that person, firm, association, or corporation and, while performing the job, to act as an undercover operative, employee, or independent contractor of a licensee, but under the supervision of a licensee.

A person who is engaged in an alarm systems business subject to the provisions of Chapter 74D of the General Statutes.

A person who obtains or verifies information regarding applicants for employment, with the knowledge and consent of the applicant, and is (i) engaged in business as a private personnel service as defined in

G.S. 95-47.1

or engaged in business as a private employer fee pay personnel service, (ii) engaged in the business of obtaining or verifying information regarding applicants for employment, or (iii) an employer with whom the applicant has applied for employment.

A person who conducts efficiency studies. An efficiency study is an analysis of an employer’s business, made at the request of the employer, to determine one or more of the following:

The most efficient procedures by which an employee of the business can perform the employee’s assigned duties.

The adequacy of an employee’s performance of the employee’s assigned duties that require interaction with a client or customer of the business.

If a person making an efficiency study observes an instance of theft or another illegal act committed by an employee of the business, the person may report the instance to the employer without violating

G.S. 74C-3

(a)(8).

Research laboratories and consultants who analyze, test, or in any way apply their expertise to interpreting, evaluating, or analyzing facts or evidence submitted by another in order to determine the cause or effect of physical or psychological occurrences, and give their opinions and findings to the requesting source or to a designee of the requestor.

A person who works regularly and exclusively as an employee of an employer in connection with the business affairs of that employer. If the employee is an armed security guard and wears, carries, or possesses a firearm in the performance of the employee’s duties, the provisions of

G.S. 74C-13

apply.

An employee of a security department of a private business or other employee whose primary duty involves loss prevention or that conducts investigations on matters internal to the business affairs of the business or related to the location, disposition, or recovery of lost or stolen property reasonably believed to be owned by the business.

Representatives of nonprofit organizations funded all or in part by business improvement districts who provide information and directions to local tourists and residents, engage in street cleaning and beautification services within the business improvement districts, and notify local law enforcement of any illegal activity observed by the representatives within the business improvement districts.

Emergency medical services personnel credentialed under Article 7 of Chapter 131E of the General Statutes who engage in search and rescue activities at the request of either the State, a political subdivision of the State, or one of the following types of facilities: an adult care home licensed under Chapter 131D of the General Statutes, a health care facility or agency licensed under Chapter 131E of the General Statutes, or a facility licensed to offer mental health, developmental disabilities, or substance abuse services under Chapter 122C of the General Statutes. For the purposes of this subdivision, “search and rescue” means activities and documents relating to efforts to locate an individual following the individual’s disappearance. This exemption shall not apply if the emergency medical services provider provides services beyond emergency search and rescue and said activities meet the definition of private protective services as defined in

G.S. 74C-3

.

A person engaged in (i) computer or digital forensic services or in the acquisition, review, or analysis of digital or computer-based information, whether for the purposes of obtaining or furnishing information for evidentiary or other purposes, or for providing expert testimony before a court; or (ii) network or system vulnerability testing, including network scans and risk assessment and analysis of computers connected to a network.

History.

1973, c. 528, s. 1; 1977, c. 481; 1979, c. 818, s. 2; 1981, c. 807, ss. 1-3; 1983, c. 259; c. 786, ss. 2, 3; c. 794, s. 1; 1987, c. 284; c. 657, s. 1; 1989, c. 759, s. 3; 2001-487, s. 64(a); 2006-264, s. 46; 2007-469, s. 6; 2007-511, s. 1; 2009-328, s. 1; 2019-193, s. 1(a); 2020-3, s. 4.15(a); 2020-15, s. 2; 2021-180, s. 19D.2.

§ 74C-4.
Private Protective Services Board established; members; terms; vacancies; compensation; meetings.

The Private Protective Services Board is hereby established in the Department of Public Safety to administer the licensing and set educational and training requirements for persons, firms, associations, and corporations engaged in a private protective services profession within this State.

The Board shall consist of 14 members: the Secretary of Public Safety or the Secretary’s designated representative, seven persons appointed by the Governor, three persons appointed by the General Assembly upon the recommendation of the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, and three persons appointed by the General Assembly upon the recommendation of the Speaker of the House of Representatives. All appointments by the General Assembly shall be subject to the provisions of

G.S. 120-121

, and vacancies in the positions filled by those appointments shall be filled pursuant to

G.S. 120-122

. One of those persons appointed by the General Assembly upon the recommendation of the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, three of the members appointed by the Governor, and all three persons appointed by the General Assembly upon the recommendation of the Speaker of the House of Representatives shall be licensees under this Chapter; all other appointees may not be licensees of the Board nor licensed by the Board while serving as Board members. All persons appointed shall serve terms of three years. With the exception of the Secretary of Public Safety or the Secretary’s designated representative, no person shall serve more than eight consecutive years on the Board. Board members may continue to serve until their successors have been appointed. The initial terms of three of the members appointed by the Governor shall expire July 1, 2020. The initial terms of one member appointed by each authority making an appointment pursuant to this subsection shall expire July 1, 2021. All other initial terms of members appointed pursuant to this subsection shall expire July 1, 2022.

Vacancies on the Board occurring for any reason shall be filled by the authority making the original appointment of the person causing the vacancy.

Each member of the Board, before assuming the duties of his office, shall take an oath for the faithful performance of his duties. A Board member may be removed at the pleasure of the authority making the original appointment or by the Board for misconduct, incompetence, or neglect of duty.

Members of the Board who are State officers or employees shall receive no per diem compensation for serving on the Board, but shall be reimbursed for their expenses in accordance with

G.S. 138-6

. Members of the Board who are full-time salaried public officers or employees other than State officers or employees shall receive no per diem compensation for serving on the Board, but shall be reimbursed for their expenses in accordance with

G.S. 138-6

in the same manner as State officers or employees. All other Board members shall receive per diem compensation and reimbursement in accordance with

G.S. 93B-5

.

The Board shall elect a Chair, vice-chair, and other officers and committee Chairs from among its members as the Board deems necessary and desirable at the first meeting after July 1 of each year. The Chair and vice-chair shall be selected by the members of the Board for a term of one year and shall be eligible for reelection. The Board shall meet at the call of the Chair or a majority of the members of the Board at such time, date, and location as may be decided upon by a majority of the Board.

All decisions heretofore made by the Private Protective Services Board, established pursuant to Chapter 74B, shall remain in full force and effect unless and until repealed or suspended by action of the Private Protective Services Board established herein.

The Board shall pay the appropriate State agency for the use of physical facilities and services provided to it by the State.

History.

1973, c. 528, s. 1; 1975, c. 592, ss. 8, 9; 1977, c. 535; 1979, c. 818, s. 2; 1981, c. 148, s. 1; c. 807, s. 7; 1983, c. 794, s. 7; 1985, c. 597, s. 12; 1989, c. 759, s. 4; 1995, c. 490, s. 39; 2000-181, s. 2.3; 2011-145, s. 16.3(a); 2014-100, s. 17.5(c); 2019-32, s. 4.

§ 74C-5.
Powers of the Board.

In addition to the powers conferred upon the Board elsewhere in this Chapter, the Board shall have the power to do all of the following:

Adopt rules necessary to carry out and administer the provisions of this Chapter including the authority to require the submission of reports and information by licensees under this Chapter.

Determine minimum qualifications, establish and require written or oral examinations, and establish minimum education, experience, and training standards for applicants and licensees under this Chapter.

Conduct investigations regarding alleged violations and to make evaluations as may be necessary to determine if licensees and trainees under this Chapter are complying with the provisions of this Chapter.

Adopt and amend bylaws, consistent with law, for its internal management and control.

Approve individual applicants to be licensed or registered according to this Chapter.

Deny, suspend, or revoke any license or trainee permit issued or to be issued under this Chapter to any applicant, licensee, or permit holder who fails to satisfy the requirements of this Chapter or the rules established by the Board. The denial, suspension, or revocation shall be in accordance with Chapter 150B of the General Statutes of North Carolina.

Issue subpoenas to compel the attendance of witnesses and the production of pertinent books, accounts, records, and documents. The district court shall have the power to impose punishment pursuant to G.S. Chapter 5A, Article 2, for acts occurring in matters pending before the Private Protective Services Board which would constitute civil contempt if the acts occurred in an action pending in court.

Repealed by Session Laws 1989, c. 759, s. 5.

Adopt rules governing detection of deception schools, and charge fees for reimbursement of costs incurred pursuant to approval of the schools.

Contract for services as necessary to carry out the functions of the Board.

Approve training schools, instructors, and course materials for any person, firm, association, or corporation wishing to provide training described in this Chapter.

Approve a design for a badge or shield that indicates a person is licensed or registered to engage in private protective services. The badge or shield shall be approved by the North Carolina Sheriffs’ Association and the North Carolina Association of Chiefs of Police.

History.

1973, c. 528, s. 1; c. 1331, s. 3; 1979, c. 818, s. 2; 1981 (Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1359, s. 3; 1983, c. 794, s. 2; c. 810; 1989, c. 759, s. 5; 1999-456, s. 19; 2007-511, s. 2.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2007-511, s. 2, effective October 1, 2007, in the introductory paragraph, added “do all of the following”; substituted “Adopt rules” for “Promulgate rules” in subdivision (1); substituted “Adopt rules” for “Establish rules” in subdivision (9); added subdivisions (11) and (12); and made minor stylistic changes throughout the section.

OPINIONS OF ATTORNEY GENERAL

Temporary employment agency providing armed guards to its clients

on a contractual basis falls within the definition of a contract security company and must be licensed by the Board as a statutory prerequisite to engaging in the private protective services business as defined in

G.S. 74C-3

. See opinion of Attorney General to Mr. James F. Kirk, Administrator, N.C. Private Protection Services Board, 57 N.C. Op. Att'y Gen. 55 (Oct. 16, 1987).

Temporary employment agency under contract to North Carolina Ports Authority to provide armed guards

who are certified law-enforcement officers under Chapter 17C must be licensed under this Chapter, even though the Chief of Security for the Ports Authority interviews and selects the officers hired by the agency to provide armed security for the Ports Authority, where the agency places the guards on its payroll, withholds taxes and social security and provides other fringe benefits. See opinion of Attorney General to Mr. James F. Kirk, Administrator, N.C. Private Protection Services Board, 57 N.C. Op. Att'y Gen. 55 (Oct. 16, 1987).

The Private Protective Services Board has the authority to inspect the records of all licensees

as part of an evaluation conducted pursuant to subdivision (3). See opinion of Attorney General to James F. Kirk, Administrator, N.C. Private Protective Services Board, 60 N.C. Op. Att'y Gen. 12 (1990).

The Private Protective Services Board does not have authority to issue temporary private investigator trainee permits

and cannot delegate authority to the Administrator to issue such a permit. See opinion of Attorney General to Mr. Wayne Woodard, Administrator, Private Protective Services Board, 1999 N.C. AG LEXIS 29 (11/22/99).

§ 74C-6.
Position of Director created.

The position of Director of the Private Protective Services Board is hereby created within the Department of Public Safety. The Secretary of Public Safety shall appoint a person to fill this full-time position. The Director’s duties shall be to administer the directives contained in this Chapter and the rules promulgated by the Board to implement this Chapter and to carry out the administrative duties incident to the functioning of the Board in order to actively police the private protective services industry to ensure compliance with the law in all aspects.

History.

1973, c. 528, s. 1; 1979, c. 818, s. 2; 1999-456, s. 20; 2001-487, s. 64(b); 2014-100, s. 17.5(b), (d).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2014-100, s. 17.5(b), (d), effective July 1, 2014, substituted “Department of Public Safety” for “Department of Justice” in the first sentence; and substituted “Secretary of Public Safety” for “Attorney General” in the second sentence.

OPINIONS OF ATTORNEY GENERAL

The Private Protective Services Board cannot delegate its authority to a supervising private investigator

to conduct a criminal background check, verify previous employment, check character references, and submit a report that is stapled to the request for a temporary permit. See opinion of Attorney General to Mr. Wayne Woodard, Administrator, Private Protective Services Board, 1999 N.C. AG LEXIS 29 (11/22/99).

§ 74C-7.
Investigative powers of the Secretary of Public Safety.

The Secretary of Public Safety for the State of North Carolina shall have the power to investigate or cause to be investigated any complaints, allegations, or suspicions of wrongdoing or violations of this Chapter involving individuals licensed, or to be licensed, under this Chapter. Any investigation conducted pursuant to this section is confidential and is not subject to review under

G.S. 132-1

until the investigation is complete and a report is presented to the Board. However, the report may be released to the licensee after the investigation is complete but before the report is presented to the Board.

History.

1973, c. 528, s. 1; 1979, c. 818, s. 2; 2009-328, s. 2; 2014-100, s. 17.5(b).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-328, s. 2, effective October 1, 2009, added the last two sentences.

Session Laws 2014-100, s. 17.5(b), effective July 1, 2014, substituted “Secretary of Public Safety” for “Attorney General” in the section heading, and throughout the section.

§ 74C-8.
License requirements.

License Required. — Any person, firm, association, or corporation desiring to carry on or engage in the private protective services profession in this State shall be licensed in accordance with this Chapter.

Application. — To apply for a license, an applicant must submit a verified application in writing to the Board that includes all of the following:

Full name, home address, post office box, and the actual street address of the applicant’s business.

The name under which the applicant intends to do business.

A statement as to the general nature of the business in which the applicant intends to engage.

The full name and address of any partners in the business and the principal officers, directors and business manager, if any.

The names of not less than three unrelated and disinterested persons as references of whom inquiry can be made as to the character, standing, and reputation of the persons making the application.

Such other information, evidence, statements, or documents as may be required by the Board.

Accompanying trainee permit applications only, a notarized statement signed by the applicant and his employer stating that the trainee applicant will at all times work with and under the direct supervision of a licensed private detective.

Qualifying Agent. — A business entity, other than a sole proprietorship, that engages in private protective services is subject to all of the requirements listed in this subsection with respect to a qualifying agent. For purposes of this Chapter, a “qualifying agent” is an individual in a management position who is licensed under this Chapter and whose name and address have been registered with the Director. The requirements are:

The business entity shall employ a designated resident qualifying agent who meets the requirements for a license issued under this Chapter and who is, in fact, licensed under the provisions of this Chapter, unless otherwise approved by the Board. Provided however, that this approval shall not be given unless the business entity has and continuously maintains in this State a registered agent who shall be an individual resident in this State. Service upon the registered agent appointed by the business entity of any process, notice, or demand required by or permitted to be served upon the business entity by the Private Protective Services Board shall be binding upon the business entity and the licensee. Nothing herein contained shall limit or affect the right to serve any process, notice, or demand required or permitted by law to be served upon a business entity in any other manner now or hereafter permitted by law.

Repealed by Session Laws 2009-328, s. 3, effective October 1, 2009.

In the event that the qualifying agent upon whom the business entity relies in order to do business ceases to perform his duties as qualifying agent, the business entity shall notify the Director within 10 working days. The business entity must obtain a substitute qualifying agent within 30 days after the original qualifying agent ceases to serve as qualifying agent unless the Board, in its discretion, extends this period, for good cause, for a period of time not to exceed three months.

The certificate authorizing the business entity to engage in a private protective services profession shall list the name of at least one designated qualifying agent. No licensee shall serve as the qualifying agent for more than one business entity without prior approval of the Director, subject to the approval of the Board.

Repealed by Session Laws 2009-328, s. 3, effective October 1, 2009.

Criminal Record Check. — An applicant must meet all of the following requirements and qualifications determined by a background investigation conducted by the Board in accordance with

G.S. 74C-8.1

and upon receipt of an application:

That the applicant is at least 18 years of age.

That the applicant is of good moral character and temperate habits. The following shall be prima facie evidence that the applicant does not have good moral character or temperate habits: conviction by any local, State, federal, or military court of any crime involving the illegal use, carrying, or possession of a firearm; conviction of any crime involving the illegal use, possession, sale, manufacture, distribution, or transportation of a controlled substance, drug, narcotic, or alcoholic beverage; conviction of a crime involving felonious assault or an act of violence; conviction of a crime involving unlawful breaking or entering, burglary, larceny, or any offense involving moral turpitude; or a history of addiction to alcohol or a narcotic drug; provided that, for purposes of this subsection, “conviction” means and includes the entry of a plea of guilty or no contest or a verdict rendered in open court by a judge or jury.

Repealed by Session Laws 1989, c. 759, s. 6.

That the applicant has the necessary training, qualifications, and experience in order to determine the applicant’s competency and fitness as the Board may determine by rule for all licenses to be issued by the Board.

Examination. — The Board may require the applicant to demonstrate the applicant’s qualifications by oral or written examination or by successful completion of a Board-approved training program, or all three.

Issuance. — Upon a finding that the application is in proper form, the completion of the background investigation, and the completion of an examination required by the Board, the Director shall submit to the Board the application and the Director’s recommendations. Upon completion of the background investigation, the Director may issue a temporary license pending approval of the application by the Board at the next regularly scheduled meeting. The Board shall determine whether to approve or deny the application for a license. Upon approval by the Board, a license will be issued to the applicant upon payment by the applicant of the initial license fee and the required contribution to the Private Protective Services Education Fund, and certificate of liability insurance.

through (5) Repealed by Session Laws 1989, c. 759, s. 6.

Confidentiality. — Except for purposes of administering the provisions of this section and for law enforcement purposes, the home address or telephone number of an applicant, licensee, or the spouse, children, or parents of an applicant or licensee is confidential under

G.S. 132-1.2

, and the Board shall not disclose this information unless the applicant or licensee consents to the disclosure. The provisions of this subsection shall not apply when a licensee’s home address or telephone number is also the licensee’s business address and telephone number. Violation of this subsection shall constitute a Class 3 misdemeanor.

History.

1973, c. 47, s. 2; c. 528, s. 1; 1975, c. 592, s. 1; 1977, c. 570, s. 2; 1979, c. 818, s. 2; 1983, c. 673, s. 3; c. 794, ss. 3, 11; 1985, c. 560; 1987, c. 657, ss. 2, 2.1; 1989, c. 759, s. 6; 1999-446, s. 1; 2001-487, s. 64(c); 2002-147, s. 3; 2009-328, s. 3.

§ 74C-8.1.
Criminal background checks.

Authorization. — Upon receipt of an application for a license, registration, certification, or permit, the Board shall conduct a background investigation to determine whether the applicant meets the requirements for a license, registration, certification, or permit set out in

G.S. 74C-8(d)

. The Department of Public Safety may provide a criminal record check to the Board for a person who has applied for a new or renewal license, registration, certification, or permit through the Board. The Board shall provide to the Department of Public Safety, along with the request, the fingerprints of a new applicant, and the Department of Public Safety shall provide a criminal record check based upon the applicant’s fingerprints. The Board may request a criminal record check from the Department of Public Safety for a renewal applicant based upon the applicant’s fingerprints in accordance with policy adopted by the Board. The Board shall provide any additional information required by the Department of Public Safety and a form signed by the applicant consenting to the check of the criminal record and to the use of the fingerprints and other identifying information required by the State or national repositories. The applicant’s fingerprints shall be forwarded to the State Bureau of Investigation for a search of the State’s criminal history record file, and the State Bureau of Investigation shall forward a set of the fingerprints to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for a national criminal history check. The Department of Public Safety may charge each applicant a fee for conducting the checks of criminal history records authorized by this subsection.The Board may require a new or renewal applicant to obtain a criminal record report from one or more reporting services designated by the Board to provide criminal record reports. Applicants are required to pay the designated reporting service for the cost of these reports.

Confidentiality. — The Board shall keep all information obtained pursuant to this section confidential in accordance with applicable State law and federal guidelines, and the information shall not be a public record under Chapter 132 of the General Statutes.

History.

2009-328, s. 4; 2014-100, s. 17.1(o).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2014-100, s. 17.1(o), effective July 1, 2014, substituted “Department of Public Safety” for “Department of Justice” throughout
subsection (a).